test/src/morphology/verbDertoNomen_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against 
# ? = not checked

# Nomens derived form verbs. The verb to nomen derivations are the following: +Der/mus, +Der/NomAct, +Der/NomAg, +Der/lis, +Der/ahtes, +Der/r, +Der/ahkes. The derivation +Der/dahka is also in the root file, but it it outcommented in the lexicon file. 

Tests:

  Verb - iellet: # DeverbalNounsBASSAT (bassat, jiehket, juhkat, láhppet, máhttet)
    iellet+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: iellem
    iellet+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Gen: iellema
    iellet+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Nom: ielle
    iellet+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Acc: iellev
    iellet+V+TV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Nom: iellemus
    iellet+V+TV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Ill: iellemussaj
    iellet+V+TV+Der/lis+A+Sg+Nom: ællális
    iellet+V+TV+Der/lis+A+Sg+Ela: ællálisás
    iellet+V+TV+Der/lis+A+Attr: ællális
    iellet+V+TV+Der/r+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Verb - vádtset: # DeverbalNounsRAVGGAT IV (ravggat, viedjet, bårssjot, buollet, boahtet, vilssjot)
    vádtset+V+IV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Nom: vádtsemus 
    vádtset+V+IV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Gen: vádtsemusá
    vádtset+V+IV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: vádtsemusáma
    vádtset+V+IV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Acc: vádtsemusáv
    vádtset+V+IV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Ine: vádtsemusán
    vádtset+V+IV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Ill: vádtsemussaj
    vádtset+V+IV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Ela: vádtsemusás
    vádtset+V+IV+Der/mus+N+Pl+Acc: vádtsemusájt
    vádtset+V+IV+Der/mus+N+Pl+Ine: vádtsemusájn
    vádtset+V+IV+Der/mus+N+Pl+Ill: vádtsemusájda
    vádtset+V+IV+Der/mus+N+Ess: vádtsemussan
    vádtset+V+IV+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Nom: vádtse
    vádtset+V+IV+Der/NomAg+N+Pl+Acc: vádtsijt
    vádtset+V+IV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: vádtsem
    vádtset+V+IV+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Ill: vádtesmijda
    vádtset+V+IV+Der/lis+A+Sg+Nom: vádtsális
    vádtset+V+IV+Der/lis+A+Pl+Ine: vádtsálisájn
    vádtset+V+IV+Der/r+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Verb - asstat: # DeverbalNounsASSTAT IV (asstat)
    asstat+V+IV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Nom: asstamus
    asstat+V+IV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Ill: asstamussaj
    asstat+V+IV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: asstam
    asstat+V+IV+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Gen: asstamij
    asstat+V+IV+Der/lis+A+Sg+Nom: asstalis
    asstat+V+IV+Der/lis+A+Pl+Acc: asstalisájt 
    asstat+V+IV+Der/r+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Verb - vádtset: # DeverbalNounsBASSALASSTET TV (bassalasstet)
    avtastahttet+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: avtastahttem
    avtastahttet+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Nom: avtastahtte
    avtastahttet+V+TV+Der/lis+A+Sg+Nom: avtastahttális
    avtastahttet+V+TV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Nom: avtastahttemus
    avtastahttet+V+TV+Der/r+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Verb - biebmadit: # DeverbalNounsBASSALASSTET TV (ahtja)
    biebmadit+V+TV+Der/ahtja+V+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: biebmadahtjam
    biebmadit+V+TV+Der/ahtja+V+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Nom: biebmadahttje
    biebmadit+V+TV+Der/ahtja+V+Der/lis+A+N+Sg+Nom: biebmadahtjális
    biebmadit+V+TV+Der/ahtja+V+Der/mus+N+Sg+Nom: biebmadahtjamus
    biebmadit+V+TV+Der/r+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Verb - biebmadit: # BASSALASSTEINCH TV (dalla, dahttem dasste, ladda, lahtta, kasste, stalla, stahtte, stasste)
    bårråt+V+IV+Der/dasste+V+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: bårrådasstem
    bårråt+V+IV+Der/dasste+V+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Ill: bårrådasstemij
    bårråt+V+IV+Der/dasste+V+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Nom: bårrådasste
    bårråt+V+IV+Der/dasste+V+Der/NomAg+N+Pl+Nom: bårrådasste
    bårråt+V+IV+Der/dasste+V+Der/lis+A+Sg+Nom: bårrådasstális
    bårråt+V+IV+Der/dasste+V+Der/lis+A+Pl+Acc: bårrådasstálisájt
    bårråt+V+IV+Der/dasste+V+Der/mus+N+Sg+Nom: bårrådasstemus
    bårråt+V+IV+Der/dasste+V+Der/mus+N+Pl+Com: bårrådasstemusáj
    bårråt+V+IV+Der/r+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Verb - gallánaddat: # DeverbalNounsRAVGGALASSTET IV (ravggalasstet)
    gallánaddat+V+IV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: gallánaddam
    gallánaddat+V+IV+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Nom: gallánadde
    gallánaddat+V+IV+Der/lis+A+Sg+Nom: gallánaddalis
    gallánaddat+V+IV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Nom: gallánaddamus

  Verb - diehtet: # DeverbalNounsDIEHTET TV (diehtet)
    diehtet+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: diehtem
    diehtet+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Gen: diehtema
    diehtet+V+TV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Nom: diehtemus
    diehtet+V+TV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Com: diehtemusájn
    diehtet+V+TV+Der/r+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Verb - tjádjánit: # DeverbalNounsJÅLLÅRIT (báhtarit, lassánit, suognalit, baládit, jållårit
    tjádjánit+V+IV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: tjádjánibme
    tjádjánit+V+IV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Acc: tjádjánimev
    tjádjánit+V+IV+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Com: tjádjánimij
    tjádjánit+V+IV+Der/NomAct+N+Ess: tjádjánibmen
    tjádjánit+V+IV+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Nom: tjádjániddje
    tjádjánit+V+IV+Der/ahkes+A+Sg+Nom: tjádjánahkes
    tjádjánit+V+IV+Der/ahkes+A+Sg+Ill: tjádjánahkkáj
    tjádjánit+V+IV+Der/ahkes+A+Pl+Com: tjádjánahkkáj
    tjádjánit+V+IV+Actio+N+Sg+Nom+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: tjádjánahtes
    tjádjánit+V+IV+Actio+N+Sg+Nom+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Ela: tjádjánahttás

  Verb - lijkkut: # JÅLLÅRITINCH (d, l, st, u/a/åd)
    lijkkut+V+TV+Der/st+V+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: lijkkustibme
    lijkkut+V+TV+Der/st+V+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Acc: lijkkustimev
    lijkkut+V+TV+Der/st+V+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Com: lijkkustimij
    lijkkut+V+TV+Der/st+V+Der/NomAct+N+Ess: lijkkustibmen
    lijkkut+V+TV+Der/st+V+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Nom: lijkkustiddje
    lijkkut+V+TV+Der/st+V+Der/ahkes+A+Sg+Nom: lijkkustahkes
    lijkkut+V+TV+Der/st+V+Actio+N+Sg+Nom+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: lijkkustahtes
    lijkkut+V+TV+Der/r+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Verb - tjáhkkidit: # DeverbalNounsUNNEDIT TV (vuorddelit, bånjådit, unnedit)
    tjáhkkidit+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: tjáhkkidibme
    tjáhkkidit+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Nom: tjáhkkididdje
    tjáhkkidit+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Ela: tjáhkkididdjes
    tjáhkkidit+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Pl+Ine: tjáhkkididdjijn
    tjáhkkidit+V+TV+Der/ahkes+A+Sg+Nom: tjáhkkidahkes
    tjáhkkidit+V+TV+Actio+N+Sg+Nom+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: tjáhkkidahtes

  Verb - mávsatjit: # DeverbalNounsMUJTATJIT TV (mujtatjit)
    mávsatjit+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: mávsatjibme
    mávsatjit+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Com: mávsatjimijn
    mávsatjit+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Nom: mávsatjime
    mávsatjit+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Nom: mávsatjiddje
    mávsatjit+V+TV+Der/ahkes+A+Sg+Nom: mávsatjahkes 
    mávsatjit+V+TV+Actio+N+Sg+Nom+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: mávsatjahtes

  Verb - måjådit: # DeverbalNounsBEGATJIT IV (begatjit)
    måjådit+V+IV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: måjådibme
    måjådit+V+IV+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Nom: måjådiddje
    måjådit+V+IV+Der/ahkes+A+Sg+Nom: måjådahkes 
    måjådit+V+IV+Actio+N+Sg+Nom+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: måjådahtes

  Verb - åhttsåt: # DeverbalNounsOADDÁT IV (oaddát)
    åhttsåt+V+IV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: åhttsåm
    åhttsåt+V+IV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Ill: åhttsåmij
    åhttsåt+V+IV+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Ela: åhttsåmijs
    åhttsåt+V+IV+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Nom: åhttsåjiddje 
    åhttsåt+V+IV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Nom: åhttsåmus
    åhttsåt+V+IV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Ela: åhttsåmusás
    åhttsåt+V+IV+Der/mus+N+Pl+Ela: åhttsåmusájs
    åhttsåt+V+IV+Der/r+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Verb - barggát: # DeverbalNounsTJUOLLÁT TV (tjuollát)
    barggát+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: barggám
    barggát+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Nom: barggájiddje 
    barggát+V+TV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Nom: barggámus
    barggát+V+TV+Der/r+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Verb - bårådit: # DeverbalNounsTJUOLLÁT TV (ahttját)
    bårådit+V+TV+Der/ahttjá+V+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: bårådahttjám
    bårådit+V+TV+Der/ahttjá+V+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Nom: bårådahttjájiddje
    bårådit+V+TV+Der/ahttjá+V+Der/mus+N+Sg+Nom: bårådahttjámus

  Verb - barrikaderit: # DeverbalNounsSTRÁFFUT TV (tsieggit> Der/r, stráffut)
    barrikaderit+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: barrikaderim
    barrikaderit+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Nom: barrikaderijiddje 
    barrikaderit+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Ine: barrikaderijiddjen 
    barrikaderit+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Pl+Ill: barrikaderijiddjijda
    barrikaderit+V+TV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Nom: barrikaderimus
    barrikaderit+V+TV+Der/r+N+Sg+Nom: barrikaderár
    barrikaderit+V+TV+Der/r+N+Sg+Gen: barrikaderára
    barrikaderit+V+TV+Der/r+N+Pl+Acc: barrikaderárijt
    barrikaderit+V+TV+Der/r+N+Sg+Nom: barrikaderár

  Verb - goarssut: # DeverbalNounsDULLUT TV/IV (vallit> Der/r, dullut)
    goarssut+V+IV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: goarssum
    goarssut+V+IV+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Nom: goarssujiddje 
    goarssut+V+IV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Nom: goarssumus
    goarssut+V+IV+Der/r+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Verb - goavnnjit: # DeverbalNounsDULLUT TV/IV (vallit> Der/r, dullut)
    goavnnjit+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: goavnnjim
    goavnnjit+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Nom: goavnnjijiddje 
    goavnnjit+V+TV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Nom: goavnnjimus
    goavnnjit+V+TV+Der/r+N+Sg+Nom: goavnnjár
    goavnnjit+V+TV+Der/r+N+Sg+Com: goavnnjárijn
    goavnnjit+V+TV+Der/r+N+Pl+Ela: goavnnjárijs
    goavnnjit+V+IV+Der/r+N+Sg+Nom: []
